Utah statutes.
31A-22-1501.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Motorboat" has the same meaning as defined under Section 73-18c-102.
(2)  "Motorboat business" means a motorboat sales agency, repair shop, service
station, storage garage, or public marina.
(3)  "Operator" has the same meaning as under Section 73-18c-102.
(4)  "Owner" has the same meaning as under Section 73-18c-102.
(5)  "Rental company" means any person or organization in the business of
providing motorboats to the public.
(6)  "Renter" means any person or organization obtaining the use of a
motorboat from a rental company under the terms of a rental agreement.
